Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1, chapter 433, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the payment of expenses of district attorneys, is increased
by $230,000, for reconciliation of personal services expenses.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (5), chapter 427, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for defense of criminal convictions, is decreased  by $3,200,000,
for a caseload adjustment.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (6), chapter 427, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for  the General Counsel Division,
is decreased by $1,000,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 427, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice,  for the Appellate Division, is in-
creased by $1,000,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 470, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or  received by the Department of State Police, for patrol services, criminal
investigations, gaming enforcement and Office of the State  Fire Marshal, is increased by
$125,040, for position reclassifications.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3,  chapter 557, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other  than
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 1
those described in section 2, chapter  557, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the
Judicial Department, is increased by $950,000, for federal grants.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 1, chapter 348, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the State Board of Tax Practitioners, is  increased by $30,000, for
operational expenses.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 4 (4), chapter 600, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  600, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the
State Department of Agriculture,  for market access, is increased by $1,000,000, for federal
grants.
SECTION 9.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 4 (3), chapter 600, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  600, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the
State Department of Agriculture, for natural resources, is  decreased by $600,000, for a re-
balance.
SECTION 10.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 4 (2), chapter 600, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  600, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the
State Department of Agriculture, for food safety, is increased by $600,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 11.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, the proceeds of bonds for the Orphan  Site
Account and federal funds from congestion mitigation  and air quality grants, drinking water
protection, laboratory accreditation and  woodstove grants and for smoke monitoring labo-
ratory services, but  excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the  Department of Environmental
Quality, for agency management, is increased by $1,000,000, for operational expenses.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 4 (5), chapter 679, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  679, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the
State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the Habitat Division, is increased by $500,000, for
federal grants.
SECTION 13.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 5, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds for contract services,  but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter 5, Oregon Laws
2021, collected or received by the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries,  for
geologic survey, is  increased by $740,000, for Laser Imaging, Detection and Ranging data
collection.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (7), chapter 425, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 2
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 425, Oregon
Laws 2021, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
the Enterprise Goods and  Services Division, is increased by $4,400,000, for the Risk Manage-
ment program.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 425, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 425, Oregon
Laws 2021, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Enterprise Goods and Services Division, is increased by $1,500,000, for the Publishing  and
Distribution program.
SECTION 16.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter 425, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 425, Oregon
Laws 2021, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
the Office of the State Chief Information Officer - Policy Division,  is increased by $6,000,000,
for a rebalance.
SECTION 17.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5)(b), chapter 425, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 425, Oregon
Laws 2021, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Office of the State Chief Information Officer - State Data Center Division, for pass-
through expenditures, is decreased by $6,000,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 18.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Secretary of State by section 1 (1), chapter 505, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Administrative Services Division, is increased by
$218,211, for information technology equipment.
SECTION 19.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Secretary of State by section 1 (2), chapter 505, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Elections Division,  is increased by $635,000, for voters’
pamphlets.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 505, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or  received by the Secretary of State, for the Archives Division, is increased
by $100,000, for restoration costs of damaged records.
SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Legislative Assembly by  section 7 (1), chapter 559, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023,  for payment of the expenses of members of the Eighty-first
Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon, is decreased by $750,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Legislative Assembly by  section 7 (2), chapter 559, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for payment of the  expenses of members of the Eighty-second
Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon, is increased by $750,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 23. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 1, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the  biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 3
ending June 30, 2023, as modified by legislative or Emergency Board action, is decreased by
$77,137,124.
SECTION 24.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5, chapter 426, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from federal funds, other than
those described in section 3, chapter  426, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the
Employment Department,  is decreased by $25,000,000 for administration of unemployment
insurance programs.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 426, Oregon Laws  2021, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts and moneys appropriated to  the Employment Department by sections 3 and 4, chapter
426, Oregon Laws 2021, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  other than those de-
scribed in section 3, chapter 426, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or  received by the Employment
Department, for unemployment  insurance, shared services and workforce operations, and
workforce and economic  research, is increased by $25,000,000, for administration of unem-
ployment insurance programs.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Housing and Community Services  Department by section 1, chapter 556, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is decreased by $20,000,000, for development
of affordable rental homes for purchase.
SECTION 27. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000, for deposit into  the Housing and
Community Services Revolving Account established  by ORS 456.574, for development of af-
fordable rental homes for purchase.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Housing and  Community Services Department by section 354, chapter 110,
Oregon Laws 2022, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for development of affordable
homes for purchase, is decreased by $20,000,000.
SECTION 29. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000, for deposit into  the Housing and
Community Services Revolving Account established by ORS 456.574,  for development of af-
fordable homes for purchase.
SECTION 30. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Housing and Community Services  Department by section 1, chapter 556, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is decreased by $4,500,000.
SECTION 31. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $4,500,000, for deposit into  the Housing and
Community Services Revolving Account established by ORS 456.574, for  down payment as-
sistance grants to culturally responsive organizations to increase homeownership opportu-
nities.
SECTION 32.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Housing and Community Services Department by  section 278, chapter 669,
Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for housing  development, con-
struction, infrastructure, rebuilding, down payment assistance, loans and  services associated
with wildfire recovery, is decreased by $27,101,190.
SECTION 33. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $27,101,190, for deposit into  the Housing and
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 4
Community Services Revolving Account established by ORS 456.574, for housing development,
construction, infrastructure, rebuilding,  down payment assistance, loans and services asso-
ciated with wildfire recovery.
SECTION 34. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Housing and  Community Services Department by section 357, chapter 110,
Oregon Laws 2022, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for homelessness response and
prevention services delivered through agency programs and community partners,  is de-
creased by $2,500,000.
SECTION 35.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,500,000, for deposit into the  Emergency
Housing Account  established by ORS 458.620, for homelessness response and prevention ser-
vices delivered through agency programs and community partners.
SECTION 36. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4,  chapter 556, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other  than
those described in sections 2 and 6, chapter 556, Oregon Laws 2021,  collected or received by
the Housing and Community  Services Department, is increased by $2,034,948, for rental as-
sistance payments administered under the Oregon Emergency Rental Assistance Program.
SECTION 37. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 442, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 442, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for maintenance and emergency  relief programs, is
increased by $70,000,000, for emergency relief expenditures.
SECTION 38. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (6), chapter 442, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 442, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for  the modernization program, is increased by
$200,000,000, for projects under construction.
SECTION 39. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Commission  for the Blind, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $200,000, for  the 2023 Salem Summer Work Experience Pro-
gram.
SECTION 40. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3,  chapter 378, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Commission for the Blind, is increased by $1,243,756, for vending  machine
purchases.
SECTION 41. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter 378, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Commission for the Blind,  is increased by $349,368, for AWARE automated
case management system maintenance and support.
SECTION 42. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3,  chapter 378, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from federal funds collected
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 5
or received by the Commission for the Blind, is increased  by $25,124, for continuity of oper-
ations, disaster recovery and data security.
SECTION 43. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (1), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for central services, is decreased by  $33,881, for a
rebalance.
SECTION 44. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for central services, is increased by $39,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 45. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for central  services, is increased by $551,946,
for a rebalance.
SECTION 46. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (2), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for state assessments and enterprise-wide  costs, is
increased by $1,830,866, for a rebalance.
SECTION 47. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (2), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by
$130,888, for a rebalance.
SECTION 48.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (2), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for  state assessments and enterprise-wide
costs, is increased by $2,401,175, for a rebalance.
SECTION 49. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by
$17,968,808, for a rebalance.
SECTION 50. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by $1,719,139, for a  re-
balance.
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 6
SECTION 51. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for  self-sufficiency programs, is increased
by $23,616,084, for a rebalance.
SECTION 52. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (5), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for child welfare programs, is decreased by $86,433,494,
for a rebalance.
SECTION 53. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (5), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for child welfare programs, is increased by $13,027,468, for a re-
balance.
SECTION 54.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (5), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for child  welfare, is increased by $5,377,215,
for a rebalance.
SECTION 55. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (6), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for aging and people with disabilities programs,  is
decreased by $128,899,352, for a rebalance.
SECTION 56. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (6), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human  Services, for aging and people with disabilities programs, is increased by
$35,576,384, for a rebalance.
SECTION 57. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (6), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department  of Human Services, for aging and people with disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $131,261,652, for a rebalance.
SECTION 58. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (7), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs,
is decreased by $104,245,636, for a rebalance.
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (7), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 7
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is  increased
by $189,438, for a rebalance.
SECTION 60. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (7), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by $220,285,146, for a rebalance.
SECTION 61.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by
$7,500,000, for the Oregon Food Bank.
SECTION 62. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (6), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for aging and people with disabilities programs, is in-
creased by $3,326,000, for grants to distressed long-term care providers.
SECTION 63.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (1), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2023, for central services, is increased by $9,389,138, for
various emergency response activities.
SECTION 64.  Section 359, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 359. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is  appropriated to the
Department of Education, for  the period beginning on [ the effective date of this 2022 Act ] April 4,
2022, and ending [ January 1, 2023 ] June 30, 2023 , out of the General  Fund, the amount of $285,339
for the staffing and other administrative costs of administering the Summer Learning Program.
SECTION 65. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for health  systems, health policy and analytics, and public
health, is decreased by $284,499,318, for a rebalance.
SECTION 66. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for health  systems, health policy and analytics, and public
health, is increased by $25,000,000, to increase hospital capacity.
SECTION 67. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (3), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for central services, state assessments and enterprise-
wide costs, is decreased by $15,594,500, for a rebalance.
SECTION 68. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 11, chapter 554, Oregon  Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for carrying out  the amendments to ORS 413.201 and 414.231
by sections  1 and 2, chapter 554, Oregon Laws 2021, is decreased by $15,352,231, for a rebal-
ance.
SECTION 69. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon  Laws 2021,
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 8
collected or received by  the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and
analytics, and public health, is increased by $452,620,767, for a rebalance.
SECTION 70. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021,
collected or received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for drug treatment and recovery ser-
vices, is decreased by $40,560,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 71. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 257, chapter 669, Oregon Laws  2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys, or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received  by the Oregon Health Authority, for the transfer of the Health Insur-
ance Marketplace from the Department of Consumer and Business Services, is decreased  by
$14,870,281, for a rebalance.
SECTION 72.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for health  systems, health policy and analytics, and public
health, is decreased by $5,000,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 73. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 4, chapter 622, Oregon Laws  2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for deposit into the Healthy Homes  Repair Fund established
under ORS 431A.402, is increased by $5,000,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 74. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5, chapter 622, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax receipts,
beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lottery funds
and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority from the Healthy
Homes Repair Fund established under  ORS 431A.402, is increased by $5,000,000, for a rebal-
ance.
SECTION 75.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 7, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses by the Public Employees’
Benefit Board  from the Public Employees’ Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums and
self-insurance, is decreased by $16,191,661, to transfer operations to the health policy  and
analytics budget for a rebalance.
SECTION 76. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 8,  chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Educators
Benefit Board from the Oregon Educators Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums  and
self-insurance, is  decreased by $17,425,293, to transfer operations to the health policy and
analytics budget for a rebalance.
SECTION 77. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is increased by $1,442,716,952, for a rebalance.
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 9
SECTION 78. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (3), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for central services, state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $5,000,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 79.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 179, chapter 110, Oregon Laws  2022, for the biennium end-
ing June  30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of
Human Services from American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund
moneys received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred to
the Department of Human  Services, for aging and people with disabilities programs, for a
one-time retention incentive payment for eligible nursing facility staff,  is decreased by
$4,432,000.
SECTION 80.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 180, chapter  110, Oregon Laws 2022, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department  of
Human Services from American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund
moneys received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred  to
the Department of Human Services,  for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, for
a one-time retention incentive payment for eligible  group home staff, is decreased by
$3,347,000.
SECTION 81.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $757,765, for court mandated expenses, for  response
to the decision in Watkins v. Ackley, 370 Or. 604 (2022).
SECTION 81a. In addition to and not in  lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount  of $181,864, for nonroutine expenses, for response to
the decision in Watkins v. Ackley, 370 Or. 604 (2022).
SECTION 81b. In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the  amount of $150,966, for the Trial Criminal Division, for response
to the decision in Watkins v. Ackley, 370 Or. 604 (2022).
SECTION 82. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (1), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for operations and health services,  is decreased by
$35,624,680, for a rebalance.
SECTION 83. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (3), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for correctional services, is decreased by $3,788,557, for
a rebalance.
SECTION 84. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (4), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for community corrections, is decreased by $600,000, for
a rebalance.
SECTION 85. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (2), chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for central administration and administrative services,
is increased by $9,853,046, for a rebalance.
SECTION 86. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3,  chapter 468, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 10
June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Department of Corrections,  is increased by $1,265,024, for the State
Criminal Alien Assistance Program.
SECTION 87. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 217, chapter  669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department  of
Corrections from American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery  Fund mon-
eys received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the
Department of Corrections, for central administration and administrative services, is  de-
creased by $15,951,122, for deferred maintenance.
SECTION 88.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 291, chapter  669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses by the  Department of
Corrections from American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery  Fund mon-
eys received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the
Department of Corrections, for operations and health services, is increased by $15,951,122.
SECTION 89.
 Section 428, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 428. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section [ 95] 291, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of Corrections  from Ameri-
can Rescue Plan  Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative  Services and transferred to the Department of Corrections, for [ the
purpose of expenditures and activities to respond to the COVID-19 public health emergency ] for  op-
erations and health services , is increased by $363,582.
SECTION 90. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (3), chapter 662, Oregon  Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023,  for emergency management, is decreased by $2,832,814,
for the establishment of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
SECTION 91. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 662, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2 (3),
chapter 662, Oregon  Laws 2021, collected or received by the Oregon Military Department, for
emergency management, is decreased by $6,295,972, for the establishment of the Oregon  De-
partment of Emergency Management.
SECTION 92. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (3), chapter 662, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
other than those described in section  2, chapter 662, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received
by the  Oregon Military Department, for emergency management, is decreased by
$177,610,616, for the establishment of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
SECTION 93. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (3), chapter 662, Oregon  Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for emergency  management, is decreased by $1,259,149,
due to federal reimbursement of disaster funding.
SECTION 94. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Department of Emergency Management by section 233, chapter  110,
Oregon Laws 2022, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for administration, is increased
by $2,832,814.
SECTION 95. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 234, chapter 110, Oregon Laws  2022, for the biennium end-
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 11
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and reimbursements from federal service  agree-
ments, but excluding  lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 234, chapter
110, Oregon Laws 2022, collected  or received by the Oregon Department of Emergency Man-
agement, for administration, is increased by $6,295,972.
SECTION 96. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 238, chapter 110, Oregon Laws  2022, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds, other
than those described in section 237, chapter 110, Oregon  Laws 2022, collected or received by
the Oregon Department of Emergency Management, for  preparedness and response, is in-
creased by $11,805,365.
SECTION 97.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 240, chapter  110, Oregon Laws 2022, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses from federal funds,  other
than those described in section 237, chapter 110, Oregon  Laws 2022, collected or received by
the Oregon Department of Emergency  Management, for mitigation and recovery, is in-
creased by $165,805,251.
SECTION 98. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to  the Oregon Department of Emergency Management by section 233, chapter 110,
Oregon Laws 2022, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for  administration, is increased
by $3,558,000, for construction costs of the Emergency Communications Center.
NOTE: Section 99 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 100. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (15), chapter 425, Oregon Laws 2021,  for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 425, Oregon
Laws 2021, collected or received by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services, is
increased by $3,650,000, for transaction costs for the sale of  parcels at Mill Creek Corporate
Center.
SECTION 101.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$6,143,428 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and federal  funds received from charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in this section, collected or received  by the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, for the acceptance  and use of funds from the Federal Emergency Management
Agency for reimbursement of expenditures related to COVID-19 emergency  response activ-
ities and personal protective equipment purchases.
SECTION 102.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Business Development Department by section  10, chapter 529,
Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the purpose  of carrying out the
provisions of sections 2 to 7, chapter 529, Oregon Laws 2021, is decreased by $5,000,000.
SECTION 103. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for deposit in the  Oregon Brownfield
Properties Revitalization Fund established by ORS 285A.198.
SECTION 104. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,000,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Oregon Business Development Department from the Oregon
Brownfield Properties Revitalization Fund established by ORS 285A.198.
SECTION 105. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 83, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2022,  for the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 12
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Business
Development Department from American Rescue  Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recov-
ery Fund moneys received by  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and trans-
ferred to the Oregon Business Development Department, for business,  innovation and trade,
for the Rural Broadband Capacity Program, is decreased by $287,800.
SECTION 106.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 607,  Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal  funds
and funds described in section 2, chapter  607, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the
Department of State Lands, for Common  School Fund Programs, is increased by $3,306,848,
for the payment of expenses related to the removal and cleanup of abandoned  and derelict
vessels.
SECTION 107. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (2), chapter 665, Oregon  Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for field services, is decreased by $1,500,000.
SECTION 108. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the allocation  made to the
Public Defense Services Commission  at the December 9, 2022, meeting of the Emergency
Board (Item No. 3), for the unrepresented  defendants/persons crisis, is decreased by
$3,618,664, which amount is available for general governmental purposes.
SECTION 109. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $715,885, for nonroutine expenses,  for the unrepre-
sented defendants/persons crisis.
SECTION 110. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount  of $2,902,779, for court mandated expenses, for the
unrepresented defendants/persons crisis.
SECTION 111. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (1), chapter 444, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, for the Executive Division, is decreased
by $50,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 112. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (2),  chapter 444, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for  the Compliance, Audit, and Perform-
ance Division, is decreased by $600,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 113. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (3), chapter 444, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Appellate  Division, is decreased by
$500,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 114. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (4), chapter 444, Oregon
Laws 2021,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Trial Criminal Division, is de-
creased by $3,756,581, for a rebalance.
SECTION 115. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (5),  chapter 444, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for nonroutine expenses, is increased  by
$865,026, for a rebalance.
SECTION 116. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (6), chapter 444, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for court mandated expenses,  is increased
by $3,291,555, for a rebalance.
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 13
SECTION 117. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (7), chapter 444, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Juvenile Division,  is increased by
$1,375,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 118. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (8),  chapter 444, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, for the Administrative Services Division,
is decreased by $475,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 119. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 28, chapter 110, Oregon
Laws 2022, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, to implement the provisions of chapter 400,
Oregon Laws 2021, is decreased by $150,000, for a rebalance.
SECTION 120. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Oregon Department of Emergency Management by section 241, chapter
110, Oregon Laws 2022, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, for debt service, is decreased
by $9,930.
SECTION 121. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for the following agencies
and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 425 1(6) +402,650
Other funds Ch. 425 2(12) -1,999,510
Lottery funds Ch. 425 3 -200,180
Department of Revenue:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 441 1(7) -282,850
Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission:
Debt service
Other funds Ch. 669 228 -129,720
(2) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 14
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 560 1(3) -963,130
Lottery funds Ch. 560 3(4) -172,640
Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
Debt Service
Lottery funds Ch. 471 2(4) -248,930
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 556 5 -2,485,600
Lottery funds Ch. 669 280 -6,920
(3) EDUCATION.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Education:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 603 4 -29,290
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
Public university
debt service
General Fund Ch. 660
1(10)(a) -192,100
Financial Assistance
Management Information
System debt service
General Fund Ch. 669 52 -44,400
(4) HUMAN SERVICES.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Health Authority:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 668 1(5) -123,840
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 15
(5) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 559 1(2) -38,840
(6) NATURAL RESOURCES.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Forestry Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 605 1(5) -365,650
Other funds Ch. 605 2(7) -402,050
State Parks and Recreation
Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 669 177 -94,500
Lottery funds Ch. 561 3 -206,340
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 679 1(4) -23,950
Water Resources Department:
Debt service
Lottery funds Ch. 665 2 -1,530,570
(7) PUBLIC SAFETY.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Corrections:
Debt service
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 16
General Fund Ch. 468 1(5) -9,127,930
Oregon Military Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 662 1(5) -1,346,370
Department of State Police:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 669 19 -183,630
Oregon Youth Authority:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 430 1(6) -1,506,310
(8) TRANSPORTATION.
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of
Transportation:
Debt service
Lottery funds Ch. 442 4 -161,840
SECTION 122. Section 423, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 423.  In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is  appropriated to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the following amounts for distribution to the following entities  for the following
purposes:
(1) Grande Ronde Hospital
Foundation for [ the expansion ]
[of the Surgical Center and ]
[facilities ..............................................$ 5,000,000]
hospital equipment.................... $ 5,000,000
(2) City of Ashland for the
Briscoe School Rehabilitation ........ $ 1,300,000
(3) Marion-Polk Food Share for
the AWARE Food Bank .................. $ 2,407,500
(4) Farmworker Housing Development
Corporation for the Cipriano
Ferrell Education Center
Renovation ..........................................$ 1,000,000
(5) Heart of Oregon Corps
Centralized Campus .......................... $ 2,000,000
(6) Eugene Civic Alliance
Civic Park ...........................................$ 6,000,000
(7) Lane County Fairgrounds
Multi-Use Facility ............................. $ 7,500,000
(8) Central Oregon
Intergovernmental Council
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 17
for the CORE3 (Central OR
Ready, Responsive,
Resilient) program ............................ $ 9,500,000
(9) Columbia Gorge Children’s
Advocacy Center (DBA
SafeSpace) for the Child
Abuse Assessment Center ............... $ 2,000,000
(10) City of Corvallis for Martin
Luther King, Jr. (MLK) Park
enhancements ..................................... $ 4,000,000
(11) Prairie City School District
#4 for the Bates Building
renovation ...........................................$ 430,000
(12) Prairie City Senior Citizens
for building renovation .................... $ 113,870
(13) Kids Club of Harney County
to support phase 2 of the
Geno’s Youth Center ........................ $ 1,340,213
(14) Oregon Food Bank for the
statewide warehouse ........................ $ 5,000,000
(15) City of Wilsonville for the
Transit Center ................................... $ 1,926,000
(16) Grant County Senior Citizens
Association for the Senior
Center flooring and air
purification system ........................... $ 36,129
(17) City of Independence to
support the 9th Street
Lift Station upgrade ......................... $ 2,000,000
(18) Benton County Crisis Center ......... $ 5,450,002
(19) Peace Village to support
SquareOne Villages .......................... $ 3,300,000
(20) MountainStar Family Relief
Nursery to support the
La Pine Satellite Location .............. $ 165,000
(21) Lane County for Emergency
Response Functionality .................... $ 5,000,000
(22) Health Care Hub of South
Deschutes County for the
La Pine Community Health
Center ..................................................$ 3,000,000
(23) Cultivate Initiatives for the
Resource Hub and Navigation
Center ..................................................$ 2,950,000
(24) City of Salem to support
Navigation Center ............................. $ 1,900,000
(25) The Canby Center to support
Thriving Together capital
improvements ..................................... $ 1,125,000
(26) City of Monmouth to support
the skate park replacement
and recreation park
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 18
improvements ..................................... $ 525,000
(27) Wheeler County to support
the Glover Hall renovation ............ $ 405,000
(28) Community Counseling Solutions
to support the Northeast
Oregon Regional Acute Care
Center ..................................................$ 4,590,000
(29) Newberg School District to
support the Old Renne Park
improvement .......................................$ 750,000
(30) Harney County Cultural Center
for County Fairgrounds ................... $ 1,360,000
(31) City of John Day to fund
the Grant Union High School
roof and the Humbolt
Elementary HVAC projects ............ $ 2,250,000
(32) Oasis Village to support
transitional housing in
Redmond..............................................$ 350,000
(33) City of Aurora Fire Station ........... $ 3,800,000
(34) Salem Housing Authority to
support Yaquina Hall ....................... $ 1,500,000
(35) Wallowa History Center to
support the restoration of
the Bear-Sleds Ranger
District Compound ............................ $ 500,000
SECTION 123.
 Section 466, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 466.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authorized appropriations and ex-
penditure limitations for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, for the following agencies and programs
are changed by the amounts specified:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 425 1(6) -62,858
Other funds Ch. 425 2(12) +486,025
Lottery funds Ch. 425 3 -423,153
Department of Revenue:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 441 1(7) -71,491
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(2) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 19
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 560 1(3) -8,955
Lottery funds Ch. 560 3(4) -3,403,866
Other funds Ch. 669 212 +3,412,834
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(3) EDUCATION.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Education:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 603 4 -233,678
Other funds Ch. 669 36 +233,685
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
Public university
debt service
General Fund Ch. 660
1(10)(a) -1,030,391
Other funds [Ch. 660 6(2) +695,171 ]
Ch. 660 6(3) +1,030,420
[Community college ]
Oregon Health and
Science University
debt service
Other funds [Ch. 660 6(3) +1,030,420 ]
Ch. 660 6(2) +695,171
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(4) HUMAN SERVICES.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 20
Department of Human
Services:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 606 1(8) -900,000
Other funds Ch. 606 2(9) +944,250
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(5) JUDICIAL BRANCH.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Judicial Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 557 1(5) -273,641
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(6) NATURAL RESOURCES.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Forestry Department:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 605 1(5) -656
Other funds Ch. 605 2(7) +660
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(7) PUBLIC SAFETY.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Corrections:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 468 1(5) -105,000
Other funds Ch. 669 5 +105,000
Department of Justice:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 427 1(7) -52,175
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(8) TRANSPORTATION.
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 21
_______________________________________________________________________________________
2021
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of
Transportation:
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 442 1(1) -180
Other funds Ch. 442 2(18) +799,991
Lottery funds Ch. 442 4 -799,809
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 124.
This 2023 Act being necessary for  the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 30, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5045 (HB 5045-A) Page 22